src/fst/phonology.twolc
"ää to aa, second vowel"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  á:o in pairs like kuátij -> koođij, säämi -> saamij čäällu%^VBACK%>m lään^RCi%>id
ä:a   <=> ä:  _ Cns:+ :i                         ( %^WG:)                            %> i:  ; 
          ä:a _ Cns:+ :i                         %^WG: %^RLEN:                       %> i:  ; 
          ä:a _ Cns:+ :i   Cns:            %^ÁI: %^WG: %^RLEN:                      [%>|.#.] ; !! viäskár:veeskir viäskár%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN
          ä:  _ Cns:+ i2:i                                                           %> [i|i3:i|Cns] Sgm:*  ; 
          ä:  _ Cns:+ a                                 ([%^WG:|%^CSH:])            [%>|.#.] ;  
          ä:  _ Cns:+ â                         ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^VBACK:)  [%>|.#.|#] ;
! Erstatte förre linje med neste löyser problemet čaävâ#škyet under, men yaml går ned frå 75 til 117. 
!          ä:  _ Cns:+ â                         ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^VBACK:) (%^RVSH:) [%>|.#.|#] ;
          ä:  _ Cns:+ [i|u]                     ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) %^VBACK: (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.] ;  
          ä:a _ Cns:+ [Vow: - u2:]              %^WG: (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK:            [%>|.#.] ;  
          ä:  _ Cns:+ â [l|d|[s|t:][t4:|t:]]  ([%^WG:|%^CSH:|%^CLEN:]) %^VBACK: (%^RLEN:) (%^SLEN:) %> ;
          ä:a _            Cns:+ [i|i2:| u2:u] ([%^WG: | %^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.] ; !! paaccim čaallum
!         ä:a _ Cns:+   â       l   (%^CSH:)  %^RLEN:  (%^SLEN:)         %>   ;  ! cntrV trond

!!€ čäähâ^WG^VBACK^RVSH#škyett4
!!€ čaavâ000#škye0t



"ää to áá and á0 in Illative and Sg3"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  ... for säämi > sáámán
ä:á <=> \Vow      _   :á   Cns:+ :á  [%^EA:|%^EX:] ([%^CSH:| %^CLEN:])  (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.]  ; !! :á  XXX
        \Vow   ä: _        Cns:+ :á  [%^EA:|%^EX:] ([%^CSH:| %^CLEN:])  (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.]  ; 
        \Vow      _   ä:  Cns:+ Vow: [%^EA:|%^EX:] ([%^CSH:| %^CLEN:])   %^RVSH:  [%>|.#.]  ; !! sámásis
     [.#.|Cns]    _  %^RV: Cns:+ :á  [%^EA:|%^EX:] (%^CSH:)             (%^RVSH:) [%>|.#.]  ; !! njálmásis
! del 2
       \Vow       _   :á   Cns:+ :Vow              (%^CSH:|%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH: (%^RLEN:)  [%>|.#.] ; !! :á
       \Vow    ä: _        Cns:+ [:Vow - u2: ]     (%^CSH:|%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH: (%^RLEN:)  [%>|.#.] ; 
       \Vow       _   ä:0  Cns:+ :Vow ([%^EA:|%^EX:]) (%^CSH:|%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH: %^RVSH: [%>|.#.] ; 
     [.#.|Cns]    _  %^RV: Cns:+ :Vow                  %^CSH:                  %^VHIGH:         [%>|.#.]  ;
          \Vow    _  %^RV: Cns:+ :Vow         (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH:                          ; ! %^RVSH: [%>|.#.]

!!€ sääm^RCi^EA>nmake
!!€ sáám0á0>n

! njaahâđ : njáhhoon 
! njääh^RCo^CLEN^VBACK^RVSH>on (Wrong stem (?) thus commented out)
! njá0hho000>on

"äRV to áá in Illative and Sg3"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  ... for täsni -> táásnán
%^RV:á <=> ä: _  Cns:+ :á   [%^EA:|%^EX:] ([%^CSH:| %^CLEN:])        %^RLEN: [%>|.#.] ; 
           ä: _  Cns:+ :Vow               (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH: %^RLEN: [%>|.#.] ;  !! čevžuin čiävžui RLEN
           ä: _  Cns:+ :Vow               (%^CSH:) %^VHIGH:          %^RLEN: [%>|.#.] ; 

!!€ tä^RVsni^EA^CSH^RLEN>n
!!€ táásná000>n

"Vowel lengthening äRV to aa "
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  äigi aaigijd
%^RV:a <=> ä:a _ Cns:+ i: (%^WG:) (%^VBACK:)            %^RLEN:  %> [i:|j] ; ! RV 
           ä:a _ Cns:+ [á|u]  %^WG:                     %^RLEN: [%>|.#.] ; ! RV  ! exit VHIGH
           ä:a _ Cns:+ [á|u|i|â|a] Cns:* %^WG: %^VBACK: %^RLEN: (%^SLEN:) [%>|.#.] ; !! kä%^RVlgâ%^WG%^VBACK%^RLEN%>m
           ä:a _ Cns:+  â Cns:+                         %^RLEN: ;  ! kä%^RVvnâst^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>

!!€ sälkki2>đ>
!!€ salkki>đ>
!!€ sääm^RCi^WG>in
!!€ saam0i0>jn
!!€ sääm^RCi^WG>id
!!€ saam0i0>jd
! riäggás%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN>  
! čuággás%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN> 
!!€ stäävi2>đ>
!!€ staavi>đ>
!!€ stäävi2>j>
!!€ staavi>j>
!!€ stäävi2>i3>
!!€ staavi>i>
! XXX i3, not i2. Check!
!!€ stäävi2>jeh>
!!€ stääve>jeh>
!!€ kä^RVvnâst^WG^VBACK^RLEN^SLEN>
!!€ kaavnâst0000>


!! #### á rules

"Root vowel change for á to ä with i in second syllable"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  päävir , já%^RVhhá%^SVl%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN>
á:ä <=>    _ [ á:|%^RV:] Cns:* :i (%^SV:) Cns:         %^ÁI: %^WG: (%^CLEN:) [%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:] [%>|.#.] ;  ! RV !! 1) pááppár:päävir
        á: _             Cns:* :i (%^SV:) [l|m|s|n:|r] %^ÁI: %^WG: (%^CLEN:)  %^RLEN:          [%>|.#.] ;  ! RV  !! 2) pááppár:päävir

!rejected, look at this:

!!€ páápp4ár^ÁI^WG^RLEN
!!€ pää0vir000


"Root and stem vowel á:a for verbs"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** 
á:a <=> [Cns|.#.|#] _        Cns:+ u2:u  %>   ;  ! RV ! conflict when \Vow:
        [Cns|.#.]   _        Cns:+ i2: %>    [i|i3:i|Cns]  ; ! RV 
        \Vow:       _ [%^RV:|á:] Cns:+ [u:|u2:] ([%^WG: | %^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: (%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:)  [%>|.#.]   ; ! 2st verb pákkuđ: pakkum/h/u
        \Vow:    á: _         Cns:+ [u:|u2:] ([%^WG: | %^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.]   ; ! nááđđu%^VBACK%^RLEN%>m naađđu>m
\Vow: a (%^RV:) Cns:+ _  ([%^CSH:|%^WG:])  (%^CLEN:) (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.] ;  ! SV  !trying this as a phonological rule for -eđ verbs
\Vow: a (%^RV:) Cns:+ :a  ([%^CSH:|%^WG:]) (%^CLEN:) (%^RLEN:) %> _ \Vow: ;  ! SUFF  !to prevent conflict

!á%^RVrgu2

!!€ pá^RVkk4u^VBACK>m>
!!€ pa0kku0>m>

!!€ pá^RVkk4u^WG^RLEN>im>
!!€ páá0hu00>im>


!! ### á and uá rules

"Monophthongisation rule uá:o0 part 2: Vowel shortening for uá" 
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  for uábbi -> obbijn  čuál%^RCi%^WG%>in tuái4jâl%^CSH%^VBACK%^RVSH%>âm
á:0 <=> u: _ Cns:+ i                     %^WG: %^CLEN: %^SVLOW:                   %> i:  ;  ! RV 
        u: _ Cns:+ :i                    %^WG:                            %^RVSH: %> i:  ;  ! RV 
        u: _ Cns:+ [i|u|â|u2:] (Cns:+) ([%^WG:|%^CSH:|%^CLEN:]) %^VBACK: %^RVSH: [%>|.#.|#] ; !! sopâvetteđ tojâdâm
        u: _ Cns:+  u                                      %^VBACK: %^RVSH:      [%>|.#.] ; !! uáinu
        u: _ Cns:+ i2:i                                                           %> [i|i3:i|Cns]  ;  ! RV 
        u: _ Cns:+ u2:u                ([%^WG: | %^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) (%^VBACK:)    %>   ; ! RV  !*


"Monophthongisation rule u:o and root vowel change u:o, special rule for olmooš and contract verbs"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = 
u:o <=>  [.#.|#] _     Cns:+ u:o (%^SV:) [š|ž]  %^WG: (%^SLEN:)  %^SVLOW: [%>|.#.] ; !! ulmu : olmooš, olmožin, carefully with only initial vowel
                 _ á:  Cns:+ u2:u             (%^CLEN:)  (%^RLEN:)         %> ; 
                 _ á:  Cns:+ i2:i                                                             %> [i|i3:i|Cns] ;  ! RV 
     [Cns|.#.|#] _ á:  Cns:+ [i|â|a|á|u] (Cns:+) (%^WG:|%^CSH:) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: (%^RLEN:) (%^SLEN:) [%>|.#.]  ;  !! oođđim            
                 _ á:0 Cns:+ [i|u|â] (Cns:+) ([%^WG:|%^CSH:|%^CLEN:]) %^VBACK: %^RVSH:       [%>|.#.|#] ; !! sopâvetteđ tojâdâm
                 _ á:0 Cns:*  i                %^WG:        %^CLEN:   %^SVLOW:     %> i:  ; ! RV 
    		     _ á:o Cns:+ Vow: j  %^ÁI: %^WG: ;                                !! puáhháá : poovij ! XXX
                 _ á:0 Cns:+ :i                %^WG:                              %^RVSH:    %> i: ; ! RV 
                 _ á:  Cns:* [i:|i3:i]         %^WG:                             (%^RLEN:)   %> i: ;  ! RV 
                 _ á:  Cns:* u2:u            ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: (%^RLEN:)  [%>|.#.] ; 
             Cns _     Cns:+ e:                                      %^VBACK:               [%>|.#.] ; 

!!€ uái4nu2>đ
!!€ o0inu>đ

!!€ tuállâ^WG^VBACK^RVSH#škyett4
!!€ to00lâ000#škye0t

"Diphthong rule uá:uo and uá:oo, part 2"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  
á:o <=> u5: _ Cns:+ u2:u                    ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) (%^VBACK:)           %>  ; !! uá > uo
        u5: _ Cns:+ u                                                   %^VBACK: (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.]  ;  !! uá > uo
        u5: _ Cns:* [u2:|u]                 ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: (%^RVSH:)   %> [m|h|u] ;  ! RV ! should not hit pu5áhtu2%>o but ču5árvu2 OBS
        u:  _ Cns:+ :i                        %^WG:                                         %> i: ;  ! RV  ! 
        u:  _ Cns:+ [i|â|a|á|u] (Cns:+)      (%^WG:|%^CSH:)(%^CLEN:)  %^VBACK: (%^RLEN:) (%^SLEN:) [%>|.#.]  ;  ! RV  ! oođđim  
        u:  _ Cns:+ Vow:      j    %^ÁI:      %^WG: [%>|.#.] ;  ! RV !puáhháá poovij 
        u   _ Cns:+ Vow:+ (Cns:) ([%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:]) %^FCD: â [%>|.#.]  ;  ! RV !stuárrá:stuorrâ
        u:o _ Cns:+ :i                        %^WG: %^RLEN:  %> i: ; ! RV 
        u:o _ Cns:+ :i    Cns:          %^ÁI: %^WG: %^RLEN: [%>|.#.] ;  ! RV !viäskár:veeskir  viäskár%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN
        u:o _ Cns:* u2:u                    ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) (%^VBACK:) %^RLEN: [%>|.#.] ; ! lagt til clen vback og o tt




"Root vowel aa:áá in C-stems with stemvowel u, part 1"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  ahhu:áhu
a:á <=> [Cns|.#.|#] _ %^RV: Cns: Cns: u [š|ž] %^CSH: (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.]  ; ! RV 


"Root vowel aa:áá in C-stems with stemvowel u, part 2"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  ahhu:ááhu
%^RV:á <=> [Cns|.#.|#] a:á _ Cns: Cns: u       [š|ž]   %^CSH: %^RLEN: [%>|.#.]   ;  ! RV !! 1)
                  \Vow: o: _ Cns:+     u [i4:|j|š|ž]  %^WG: (%^RVSH:) [%>|.#.] ;  ! RV  !! 2) poccu puásui



"Diphthongisation e to iä, part 1" 
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =   
e:i <=>  _ Vow:  Cns:+ [i2:|e:|i:|i3:] [%^EA:|%^EX:] ([%^CSH:|%^CLEN:])                ([%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:]) [%>|.#.] ;!! ergi:iärgán eeč^RCi^EA^CLEN^RVSH>s
         _ %^RV: Cns:+ [i2:|e:|i:|i3:] [%^EA:|%^EX:] ([%^CSH:|%^CLEN:|%^WG:])          ([%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:]) [%>|.#.] ;
         _ %^RV: Cns:+ u i4:                     %^WG:                                                     [%>|.#.] ; !! čevžuin čiävžui če%^RVvžui4%^WG>
         _ %^RV: Cns:+ [á|u|o|â2:]             ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:)      %^VHIGH: (%^RLEN:)          [%>|.#.] ;    
         _ e:    Cns:+  á                             (%^CSH:)                 %^VHIGH:                    [%>|.#.] ; !! peeh%^RCá%^VHIGH> peeh%^RC 
         _ e:    Cns:+ [á|u|o|â2:]      Triggers:*                                                          %> [s|o|č|p|m|á|h] ; !! piävu>s piähho>on piäváččii not meendu
         _ e:    Cns:+ á               [%^EA:|%^EX:] ([%^CSH:|%^CLEN:|%^WG:])                              [%>|.#.]  ; !! veerrá%^EA%^CSH>
         _ [%^RV:|e:]    Cns:+ u2:o Triggers:*           %> ;
    Cns: _                         [Triggers: - %^EA:]*  %> i: ; 
    Cns: _ %> ä p ;        !! SV: mánuttep : mánuttiäpán

!!€ ce^RVlkk4u2^CLEN^VHIGH^RVSH>o
!!€ ciälkko000>o

!!€ eellá^CSH^VHIGH>mušš^FCD
!!€ iä0lá00>muš00


"ie to iä in Illative and Sg3"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  kiem´ni -> kiämnán, veerdi : viärdán peerru2%^CLEN%^VHIGH%^RVSH%>o
e:ä <=> [i | e: ] _  Cns:+ Vow:        [%^EA:|%^EX:] Triggers:* [%>|.#.] ;	
        [i | e: ] _  Cns:+ Vow:        Triggers:* %^VHIGH:      [%>|.#.] ;  
       :i        _  Cns:+ [u|á|o|â2:] (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH: ([%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:]) [%>|.#.] ; !! čevžuin čiävžui
       :i        _  Cns:+ u2:o        Triggers:*                [%>|.#.] ; !! piähhoo
         \Vow :i  _  Cns:+ á           (%^CSH:) %^VHIGH:        [%>|.#.] \[Cns|Vow] ; !! eellá%^CSH%^VHIGH
         \Vow :i  _  Cns:+    â2:       %^VHIGH:                 %> m ;   !! PrfPrc Err/Orth




"Diphthongisation uo:uá"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =   
o:á <=> u _ Cns:+ u: [i4:|j|š|ž] %^WG: ([%^RVSH:|%^RLEN:]) [%>|.#.] ;  ! RV !! 1) cuobbuu cuábui, kuođhu po^RVrru^EWG>i
 	u _ Cns:+ á                           %^CSH: ; ! RV 
        u _ Cns:+ â             [%^EA:|%^EX:] %^CSH: ; ! RV 
        u _ Cns:+ [o|u|á|i|u2:]  %^VHIGH: (%^RVSH:) [%>|.#.] ; ! RV  !! 4) vuoll- > vuállus ruáttá
